ro-RO: Direcția filetului: Stânga; Dreapta; Altele
ko: 나사산 방향: 왼손; 오른손; 기타
da: Gevindretning: Venstre hånd; Højre hånd; Andet
cs: Směr závitu: Vlevo; Vpravo; Jiné
hu: Csavarmenet iránya: Baloldali; Jobboldali; Egyéb
hr-HR: Smjer navoja: Lijeva ruka; Desna ruka; Ostalo
vi: Vị trí ren: Bên trái; Bên phải; Khác
ja: ネジの方向: 左手; 右手; その他
fi: Kierteen suunta: Vasen; Oikea; Muu
lt-LT: Sriegio kryptis: Prieš laikrodžio rodyklę; Pagal laikrodžio rodyklę; Kita
sl-SI: Smer navoja: Levo; Desno; Drugo
tr: Diş yönü: Sol el; Sağ el; Diğer
pt-PT: Direção da rosca: Mão esquerda; Mão direita; Outro
en: Thread direction: Left-hand; Right-hand; Other
th: ทิศทางของเกลียว: ทวนเข็มนาฬิกา; ตามเข็มนาฬิกา; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Direção da rosca: À esquerda; À direita; Outro
el: Κατεύθυνση σπειρώματος: Αριστερή; Δεξιά; Άλλο
zh-CN: 螺纹方向: 左手; 右手; 其他
ru: Направление резьбы: Влево; Вправо; Другой
fr: Sens du fil: Gauche; Droite; Autre
es: Dirección del hilo: Izquierda; Derecha; Otros
nb: Gjengeretning: Venstre hånd; Høyre hånd; Annet
zh-TW: 螺紋方向: 左手; 右手; 其他
de: Gewinderichtung: Linke Hand; Rechte Hand; Sonstiges
it: Direzione del filo: Antioraria; Oraria; Altro
nl: Draadrichting: Links; Rechts; Andere
pl: Kierunek gwintu: Lewy; Prawy; Inne
sk-SK: Smer závitu: Ľavý; Pravý; Iné
bg-BG: Посока на резбата: Лява; Дясна; Други
sv: Trådriktning: Vänster; Höger; Övrigt